Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2514
Alternative inspections; requirements.

(1) No inspection shall be required under the Conveyance Safety Act when an owner or user of a conveyance obtains an inspection by a representative of a reputable insurance company licensed to do business in Nebraska, obtains a policy of insurance from such company upon the conveyance and files with the commissioner a certificate of inspection by such insurance company, files a statement that such conveyance is insured, and pays an administrative fee established pursuant to section 48-2506.

(2) No inspection shall be required under the act when there has been an annual inspection under a city ordinance which meets the standards of the act.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 14.